Massachusetts, session 194th, H2108.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 136 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section: -
Section 17 (a) Every person employed in agricultural and farm work, as defined in
section 2 of chapter 151, who is not the parent, child, spouse, or other member of the employer’s
immediate family, shall be entitled to accrue paid-time-off at the rate of one (1) hour for every 40
hours worked, up to a maximum of 55 hours per benefit year. A benefit year shall be defined as a
calendar year.
(b) Agricultural employees shall begin accruing paid time off commencing on the date of
hire of the employee or the date this law becomes effective, whichever is later, however
employees shall not be entitled to use accrued paid time off until the 45th calendar day following
commencement of their employment. On or after this 45-day waiting period, employees may use
earned paid time off as it accrues. Any seasonal agricultural employee returning to the same
of 5

employer as the previous harvest season shall be considered a continuing employee for the
subsequent benefit year and shall not be subject to the 45-day waiting period in the new benefit
year.
(c) At the beginning of every benefit year, January 1, all paid time off accrued by
agricultural employees, including agricultural employees performing work on a seasonal basis,
will be reset to zero hours, regardless of whether the accrued paid time off has been exhausted.
(d) All accrued paid time off taken by an agricultural employee shall be compensated at
the current rate of pay and paid out during the pay period in which the accrued paid time off is
taken.
(e) Upon resignation or discharge, agricultural employees shall be paid the paid time off
they accrued during that calendar year, in accordance with the time designated in section 148 of
chapter 149.
(f) Agricultural employees shall be allowed to take accrued paid time off for any reason if
the employee has provided reasonable notice to the employer and has accrued the requested paid
time off.
(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to replace an employers’ obligation to
provide earned sick time or paid earned sick time according to chapter 149 section 148C, which
must be provided for the reasons, and according to the terms, enumerated in that section. An
employer may not require an agricultural worker to use paid time off instead of sick time for
those reasons.
of 5

(h) Agricultural employees shall not be retaliated against, disciplined, or terminated, in
accordance with Chapter 151 section 19 of the General Laws, for using any of their available
accrued paid time off.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to discourage or prohibit an employer from
allowing the accrual of earned paid time off at a faster rate, allowing the rolling over of paid time
off balances to a new benefit year, or the use of earned paid time off at an earlier date, than this
section requires.
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following section-:
Section 204. Every person employed in agricultural and farm work as defined in section 2
of chapter 151 shall be entitled to two paid 15-minute breaks if laboring eight (8) hours or more
during any given workday: one break before and one break after the meal break required by
section 100. During their breaks, agricultural workers shall be provided with adequate conditions
to ensure temperature regulation and hydration.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in the definition of “Occupation”, after the words “professional service”, the words
“agricultural and farm work,”.
SECTION 4. Said section 2 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in the definition of “Agricultural and farm work,” after the words
“labor on a farm,” the words “and the growing and harvesting of agricultural, floricultural and
horticultural commodities” and inserting the following words:-
of 5

wherein an agricultural employee is employed by a farmer and that same employee is
engaged in solely primary agriculture, solely secondary agriculture, or both primary and
secondary agriculture. Primary agriculture shall include farming in all its branches, including the
cultivation and tillage of the soil, the production, cultivation, growing, and harvesting of
agricultural, aquacultural, floricultural and horticultural commodities, dairying, the growing and
harvesting of forest products upon forest land, the raising and keeping of livestock, bees, fur-
bearing animals, and raising and keeping of poultry, swine, cattle and other domesticated animals
used for food purposes. Secondary agriculture shall include preparing commodities for market –
including cleaning, sorting, peeling, washing, packing, and delivering commodities to storage, to
market, or to a carrier for transporting to market. An employee who never engages in either
primary or secondary agriculture on a farm is not performing agricultural and farm work even
when they engage in practices incidental to or in conjunction with farming operations on a farm
and shall not be considered an agricultural employee.
SECTION 5. Said section 2 of said chapter 151, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, after the definition of “Agricultural and farm work,” the following
definition:-
“Farm”, the site of agricultural business where both primary and secondary agriculture is
integral to the said agricultural business and are performed on a regular basis by agricultural
employees.
SECTION 6. Section 2A of said chapter 151 is hereby amended by striking out, in the
second sentence the word “$8.00” and replacing it with the following words:- the minimum
wage set forth in section 1 of this chapter.
of 5

SECTION 7. Not later than six months after the effective date of this act, the department
of labor standards shall promulgate regulations to implement Section 2. With respect to Section
2, the department of labor standards shall issue regulations after input from stakeholders
enumerating the conditions that an employer must provide to agricultural employees during their
breaks to ensure the adequate opportunity for temperature regulation during high heat-stress
months and other extreme temperature months, bathroom breaks, and hydration.
SECTION 8. Section 2 of this act shall be effective on January 1 of the calendar year
following the effective date of this act. Sections 1, 3-8 shall become effective immediately upon
passage of the act.
of 5